Washington statutes.
RCW 7.113.040

Plaintiff may use pseudonym.

In an action under this chapter, a plaintiff may proceed using a pseudonym in place of the true name of the plaintiff under applicable state law or procedural rules.

[ 2024 c 254 s 4.]